Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB872.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5(a) of the act of October 4, 1978 (P.L.864, No.167), known as the Storm Water Management Act, is amended to read:Section 5. Watershed storm water plans and contents.(a) Within two years following the promulgation of guidelines by the department pursuant to section 14, each county shall prepare and adopt a watershed storm water management plan for each watershed located in the county as designated by the department, in consultation with the municipalities located within each watershed, and shall periodically review and revise 1234567891011121314151617181920 such plan at least every five years. The department may, for good cause shown, grant an extension of time to any county for the preparation and adoption of a watershed storm water management plan. A municipality that does not have a public water or sewer system shall be exempt from participating in the watershed storm water management plan.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0872PN0908 - 2 - 12345678